Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB774.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Director" means the executive director of the Office of the Kentucky Center for
Statistics;
(2) "Fee" means a financial obligation assessed by a governmental entity that is
separate from or in addition to a fine and may include:
(a) Costs, assessments, and surcharges imposed to access services or to fund the
criminal justice system or other government services, whether imposed at
the time of arrest, booking, while in court, while incarcerated, during
diversion, or during probation or parole; and
(b) Any late fees, interest, and other service charges;
(3) "Fine" means a punitive financial sanction assessed by a governmental entity for
a criminal violation or civil infraction, including traffic or civil infractions and
code violations; and
(4) "Governmental entity" means a city, county, urban-county government, charter
county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or
other political subdivision, governmental body, or agency of the Commonwealth,
including the Department of Corrections, county jails and regional detention
facilities, and any division of the Court of Justice of the Commonwealth and the
Administrative Office of the Courts, that assesses fines or fees related to:
(a) A criminal proceeding, including bail, conditional discharge, probation,
incarceration, and parole;
(b) Adjudication of a criminal violation, including violation of local ordinances
or codes; or
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 85
(c) A civil enforcement action.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics shall develop and maintain a
statewide database and searchable public website that contains the following
information for each fine or fee assessed by a governmental agency in a criminal
proceeding or civil enforcement action:
(a) Name of the assessing governmental entity;
(b) Date of each assessment;
(c) Total amount of each assessment;
(d) Amount of each assessment that was a fine disaggregated by fine type;
(e) Amount of each assessment that was a fee disaggregated by fee type;
(f) Statute number that authorizes each fine or fee assessed;
(g) Original due date for each assessment;
(h) For any assessment subject to a payment plan:
1. The number of payments set and the frequency of the dates when due,
whether weekly, bi-monthly, monthly, or quarterly; and
2. The total length of the payment plan, in months if applicable, and date
set for the final payment to satisfy the assessment in full;
(i) Date when each assessment was paid in full as due, if applicable;
(j) Amount of any unpaid balance on the date set for final payment of each
assessment;
(k) Amount of any additional costs, including the interest or penalty assessed
for failure to pay each assessment as due;
(l) Whether the initial assessment has been reduced, restructured, or
discharged, and if so, the date and amount of the reduction, restructuring,
or discharge;
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 85
(m) Demographic information of the offender ordered to pay each fine or fee,
including gender, race, ethnicity, county of residence, marital status, and
highest educational level completed if known, and whether the offender has
qualified as a needy person under KRS 31.120 if applicable; and
(n) Identification of the governmental entity, private agency, business, or other
entity or organization authorized, or delegated with authority, to assess a
fine or a fee and that is the recipient of any portion of the fine or fee
assessment.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 6.945, each governmental entity shall submit to the
Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics, in a manner prescribed by the
Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics in administrative regulations
promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, all fines and fees
assessed by a governmental entity, or delegated to another entity to collect,
during the fiscal year that includes the data required under this section.
(b) All final data shall be submitted on or before August 1 of each year
beginning August 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The director shall publish an annual report summarizing the collected data
relating to fines and fees in the Commonwealth for the prior fiscal year and
disaggregated into the specific categories reported under Section 2 of this Act
without providing any information that could result in the identification of any
individual offender.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section shall be published on the
website of the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and submitted to the:
(a) Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Judiciary and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 85
and Revenue;
(b) Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts; and
(c) Governor;
no later than November 30 of each year beginning November 30, 2026.
Section 4. KRS 151B.133 is amended to read as follows:
The duties of the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics shall be to:
(1) Oversee and maintain the warehouse of data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data
System;
(2) Develop de-identification standards and processes using modern statistical methods;
(3) Conduct research and evaluation regarding federal, state, and local education and
training programs at all levels;
(4) Audit and ensure compliance of education and training programs with applicable
federal and state requirements as authorized by federal and state law;
(5) Work with public agencies and other entities to define statewide education,
workforce development, and employment metrics and ensure the integrity and
quality of data being collected;
(6) Link data from multiple sources for consideration in developing broad public policy
initiatives;
(7) Develop requirements and definitions for data to be provided by any public agency,
private institution of higher education, private school, or parochial school, as
directed by the Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics;
(8) Develop a reasonable fee schedule for services provided;
(9) Establish data quality standards;
(10) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary for the proper administration of the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System
and necessary for the proper administration of the duties assigned under
subsection (15) of this section;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 85
(11) Ensure compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. sec 1232g, and all other relevant federal and state privacy laws;
(12) Respond to approved research data requests in accordance with the data access and
use policy established by the board;
(13) Develop and disseminate, in cooperation with the Council on Postsecondary
Education and the Department of Education, information on the employment and
earnings of the public postsecondary institution graduates in Kentucky. This
information shall be updated at least every three (3) years and shall be:
(a) Posted on the website[Web site] of the Office of the Kentucky Center for
Statistics;
(b) Posted on the website[Web site] of the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(c) Posted on the website[Web site] of each public postsecondary institution, with
the website[Web site] address published in each institution's catalogue; and
(d) Made available to every high school guidance and career counselor, who shall
be notified of its availability for the purpose of informing all high school
students preparing for postsecondary education;[ and]
(14) Enter into contracts or other agreements with appropriate entities, including but not
limited to federal, state, and local agencies, to the extent necessary to carry out its
duties and responsibilities only if such contracts or agreements incorporate adequate
protections with respect to the confidentiality of any information to be shared; and
(15) Comply with the provisions of Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
Section 5. This Act may be cited as the Fines and Fees Reporting Act.
Section 6. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:23 AM Jacketed